Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-217
Prize, defined.

Prize means anything offered, or purportedly offered, and given, or purportedly given, to a person by chance. Prize does not include an item offered in a promotion for a book, recording, video, multimedia, or similar club in compliance with 16 C.F.R. part 425, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2002, or a continuity plan or single sale of merchandise or service where there is no minimum purchase required.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 79.